fst/nom_stems.lexc
! N49 — 6 entries
LEXICON N49_stems
  lāukiskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  lāukiskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:lāukiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  priwātiskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:priwātiskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  pusiwadūniskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:pusiwadūniskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  trinewīngiskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:trinewīngiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  wargaprātiskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:wargaprātiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Pl+Nom+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Sg+Gen+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Pl+Gen+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Sg+Akk+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;
  āustewingiskan+N+Pl+Akk+Fem:āustewingiskan  # ;

! N55 — 1 entries
LEXICON N55_stems
  Nōje+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:Nōje  # ;
  Nōje+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:Nōjes  # ;
  Nōje+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:Nōjes  # ;
  Nōje+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:Nōjen  # ;
  Nōje+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:Nōjei  # ;
  Nōje+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:Nōjemans  # ;
  Nōje+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:Nōjen  # ;
  Nōje+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:Nōjens  # ;

! N62 — 2 entries
LEXICON N62_stems
  emmens+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:emmens  # ;
  emmens+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:emnes  # ;
  emmens+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:emnin  # ;
  emmens+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:emni  # ;
  emmens+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:emnimans  # ;
  emmens+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:emnin  # ;
  emmens+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:emnins  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:sēimisemens  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:sēimisemnes  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:sēimisemnin  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:sēimisemni  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:sēimisemnimans  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:sēimisemnin  # ;
  sēimisemens+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:sēimisemnins  # ;

! N63 — 6 entries
LEXICON N63_stems
  kanapsemen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:kanapsemen  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:kanapsemenes  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:kanapsemenin  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:kanapsemeni  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:kanapsemenimmans  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:kanapsemen  # ;
  kanapsemen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:kanapsemenins  # ;
  nōmen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:nōmen  # ;
  nōmen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:nōmenes  # ;
  nōmen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:nōmenin  # ;
  nōmen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:nōmeni  # ;
  nōmen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:nomenimmans  # ;
  nōmen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:nōmen  # ;
  nōmen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:nōmenins  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:prōnomen  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:prōnomenes  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:prōnomenin  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:prōnomeni  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:pronomenimmans  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:prōnomen  # ;
  prōnomen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:prōnomenins  # ;
  pēismen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:pēismen  # ;
  pēismen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:pēismenes  # ;
  pēismen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:pēismenin  # ;
  pēismen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:pēismeni  # ;
  pēismen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:peismenimmans  # ;
  pēismen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:pēismen  # ;
  pēismen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:pēismenins  # ;
  sēmen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:sēmen  # ;
  sēmen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:sēmenes  # ;
  sēmen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:sēmenin  # ;
  sēmen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:sēmeni  # ;
  sēmen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:semenimmans  # ;
  sēmen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:sēmen  # ;
  sēmen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:sēmenins  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Sg+Nom+Neut:wūdmen  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Sg+Gen+Neut:wūdmenes  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Pl+Gen+Neut:wūdmenin  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Sg+Dat+Neut:wūdmeni  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Pl+Dat+Neut:wudmenimmans  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Sg+Akk+Neut:wūdmen  # ;
  wūdmen+N+Pl+Akk+Neut:wūdmenins  # ;

! N64 — 2 entries
LEXICON N64_stems
  zmānjai+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:zmōi  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:zmānes  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:zmāni  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:zmānimans  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  zmānjai+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:zmānins  # ;
  zmōi+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:zmōi  # ;
  zmōi+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:zmānes  # ;
  zmōi+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  zmōi+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:zmāni  # ;
  zmōi+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:zmānimans  # ;
  zmōi+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  zmōi+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:zmānins  # ;

! N65 — 2 entries
LEXICON N65_stems
  brāti+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:brāti  # ;
  brāti+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:brātri  # ;
  brāti+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:brātrimans  # ;
  emnjasbrāti+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:emnjasbrāti  # ;
  emnjasbrāti+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:emnjasbrātri  # ;
  emnjasbrāti+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:emnjasbrātrimans  # ;

! N66 — 1 entries
LEXICON N66_stems
  māti+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:māti  # ;
  māti+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:māterei  # ;
  māti+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:māterimans  # ;

! N67 — 1 entries
LEXICON N67_stems
  dukti+N+Sg+Nom+Fem:dukti  # ;
  dukti+N+Sg+Dat+Fem:dukterei  # ;
  dukti+N+Pl+Dat+Fem:dukterimmans  # ;

! N71 — 41 entries
LEXICON N71_stems
  ausegtun+N+Sg+Nom:ausegtun  # ;
  auīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:auīmtun  # ;
  belztwei+N+Sg+Nom:belztwei  # ;
  pabelztwei+N+Sg+Nom:pabelztwei  # ;
  dreztun+N+Sg+Nom:dreztun  # ;
  izdreztun+N+Sg+Nom:izdreztun  # ;
  ebgrjaūztun+N+Sg+Nom:ebgrjaūztun  # ;
  ebgrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:ebgrēnztun  # ;
  ebīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebīmtun  # ;
  enīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:enīmtun  # ;
  skērtwei+N+Sg+Nom:skērtwei  # ;
  etgrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:etgrēnztun  # ;
  etsegtun+N+Sg+Nom:etsegtun  # ;
  etīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:etīmtun  # ;
  gīntun+N+Sg+Nom:gīntun  # ;
  grjaūztun+N+Sg+Nom:grjaūztun  # ;
  grēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:grēnztun  # ;
  izgrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:izgrēnztun  # ;
  pergrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:pergrēnztun  # ;
  pergrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:pergrēnztun  # ;
  pergrēnztun+N+Sg+Nom:pergrēnztun  # ;
  gūntun+N+Sg+Nom:gūntun  # ;
  izgūntun+N+Sg+Nom:izgūntun  # ;
  pagūntun+N+Sg+Nom:pagūntun  # ;
  gūztun+N+Sg+Nom:gūztun  # ;
  izgūztun+N+Sg+Nom:izgūztun  # ;
  izgūztwei+N+Sg+Nom:izgūztwei  # ;
  izweztun+N+Sg+Nom:izweztun  # ;
  izīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:izīmtun  # ;
  keptun+N+Sg+Nom:keptun  # ;
  napintun+N+Sg+Nom:napintun  # ;
  pasprangtun+N+Sg+Nom:pasprangtun  # ;
  perweztun+N+Sg+Nom:perweztun  # ;
  pintun+N+Sg+Nom:pintun  # ;
  praīmtun+N+Sg+Nom:praīmtun  # ;
  preisegtun+N+Sg+Nom:preisegtun  # ;
  sprangtun+N+Sg+Nom:sprangtun  # ;
  segtun+N+Sg+Nom:segtun  # ;
  skērtun+N+Sg+Nom:skērtun  # ;
  weztun+N+Sg+Nom:weztun  # ;
  īmtun+N+Sg+Nom:īmtun  # ;

! N72 — 6 entries
LEXICON N72_stems
  aumestun+N+Sg+Nom:aumestun  # ;
  etmestun+N+Sg+Nom:etmestun  # ;
  mestun+N+Sg+Nom:mestun  # ;
  namestun+N+Sg+Nom:namestun  # ;
  pamestun+N+Sg+Nom:pamestun  # ;
  preimestun+N+Sg+Nom:preimestun  # ;

! N73 — 9 entries
LEXICON N73_stems
  aušpānstun+N+Sg+Nom:aušpānstun  # ;
  enwestun+N+Sg+Nom:enwestun  # ;
  izwestun+N+Sg+Nom:izwestun  # ;
  perwestun+N+Sg+Nom:perwestun  # ;
  skūrstun+N+Sg+Nom:skūrstun  # ;
  spenstun+N+Sg+Nom:spenstun  # ;
  westun+N+Sg+Nom:westun  # ;
  prawestun+N+Sg+Nom:prawestun  # ;
  prawestun+N+Sg+Nom:prawestun  # ;
